Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 3
HEMOPHILIA TREATMENT CENTER

23-21-301. Legislative declaration.

In order to foster the health, welfare, and safety of the people of this state and to facilitate the research and treatment of hemophilia and related diseases, it is hereby declared to be the policy of this state to achieve the maximum practical degree of care and treatment for persons suffering from hemophilia and other related diseases.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 770, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 66-43-1.

23-21-302. Definitions.

As used in this part 3, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Committee" means the hemophilia advisory committee.

"Hemophilia" means a bleeding tendency resulting from a genetically determined deficiency factor in the blood.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 770, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 66-43-2.

23-21-303. Center created - committee established.

There is hereby established the hemophilia treatment center within the university of Colorado school of medicine. Such treatment center shall use existing facilities and staff of the university of Colorado school of medicine and may establish programs for the care and treatment of persons suffering from hemophilia as they are needed. The hemophilia treatment center shall assist those persons who require continuing treatment with blood, blood derivatives, or a manufactured pharmaceutical product to avoid crippling, hospitalization, or other effects associated with hemophilia but who are unable to pay for the entire cost of such services on a continuing basis despite the existence of various types of hospital and medical insurance, medicare, medicaid, other government assistance programs, and private charitable assistance.

The governor shall appoint a committee to consult with the school of medicine in the administration of this part 3. The committee shall be composed of eleven members representing hospitals, voluntary agencies interested in hemophilia, medical specialists in hemophilia patient care, and the general public; but no group shall have more than four members on the committee. Each member of the committee shall hold office for a term of four years and until his successor is appointed and qualified; except that, of those members first appointed, two shall be appointed for one-year terms, three shall be appointed for two-year terms, three shall be appointed for three-year terms, and three shall be appointed for four-year terms. Any vacancy occurring on the committee shall be filled by appointment by the governor for the unexpired term. The committee shall meet at least annually and at such other times as the governor deems necessary. Members of the committee shall receive no compensation but shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 770, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 66-43-3.

L. 86:

(2) amended, p. 413, § 23, effective March 26.

L. 89:

(2)(b) repealed, p. 1147, § 3, effective April 6.

23-21-304. Duties of the school of medicine.

It is the duty of the school of medicine, with the advice of the committee, to:

Develop standards for determining eligibility for care and treatment under this part 3;

Assist in the development and expansion of programs for the care and treatment of persons suffering from hemophilia, including home care and medical and dental procedures designed to provide maximum control over bleeding;

Extend financial assistance to persons suffering from hemophilia to obtain blood, blood derivatives and concentrates, and other efficacious agents for use in hospital, medical, and dental facilities and in the home;

Institute and carry on educational programs for the detection of hemophilia in the community and for the counseling of individuals and families;

Conduct educational programs for physicians, dentists, hospitals, county or district public health agencies, and the public concerning the methods of care and treatment for persons suffering from hemophilia.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 771, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 66-43-4.

L. 2010:

(1)(e) amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2081, § 56, effective August 11.